Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,104
Applicability of sections.

(a) A provision treating a corporation's indemnification of or advance for expenses to directors that is contained in its articles of incorporation, bylaws, a resolution of its members or board of directors, or in a contract or otherwise, is valid only if and to the extent the provision is consistent with the provisions of sections 21-1996 to 21-19,104. If articles of incorporation limit indemnification or advance for expenses, indemnification and advance for expenses are valid only to the extent consistent with the articles.

(b) Sections 21-1996 to 21-19,104 do not limit a corporation's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with appearing as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 104.